Utah statutes.
23-20-2.   Special deputies -- Appointment -- Duties.

The director of the Division of Wildlife Resources is authorized to appoint persons, on a temporary basis, as special deputies. These special deputies shall have the authority to enforce provisions of this code and all rules and regulations promulgated under this code.



Enacted by Chapter 46, 1971 General Session

